Massachusetts, session 194th, H3592.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 7C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following new section:-
Section 73. Whereas public buildings and infrastructure are the physical manifestation of
the commonwealth’s identity and connection with its citizens, and whereas the commonwealths
rich diversity of cultural communities is one of its greatest assets, and whereas a statewide public
art program would ensure that our citizenry’s diverse cultural heritage enhances the built
environment across the state and result in increased civic participation and economic prosperity
through local investment and increased tourism, therefore the commonwealth will enact An Act
establishing a program for local art and community engagement.
There shall be in the executive office of housing and livable communities a commission
to be known as the program for local art and community engagement commission (“the PLACE
of 5

Commission”), which shall consist of 1 member to be appointed by the governor and who shall
be an artist or representative from a nonprofit or community organization with experience in
and/or commitment to the creation, installation, and/or administration of public art ; 1 member to
be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and who shall be an artist or
representative from a nonprofit or community organization with experience in and/or
commitment to the creation, installation, and/or administration of public art; 1 member to be
appointed by the senate president and who shall be an artist or representative from a nonprofit or
community organization with experience in and/or commitment to the creation, installation,
and/or administration of public art; the secretary of housing and livable communities or a
designee; the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance or a designee; the
executive director of the massachusetts cultural council or a designee; 1 member appointed by
the president of the massachusetts college of art and design; 1 member appointed by the
executive director of the massachusetts association of community development corporation; and
1 member appointed by the executive director of the metropolitan area planning council. Best
efforts shall be exercised to ensure that each iteration of the PLACE Commission contains
representation from the Commonwealth’s different geographic regions. The PLACE
Commission will be co-chaired by the Secretary of Housing and Livable Communities or a
designee and the executive director of the Mass Cultural Council or a designee. The PLACE
Commission shall meet once each quarter and otherwise at the discretion of the chairs.
Each appointive member shall be appointed for a term of three years, with the members
initially appointed serving staggered terms. Persons appointed to fill vacancies shall serve for the
unexpired term. Any member shall be eligible for reappointment, except that no appointive
of 5

member shall serve for more than two consecutive terms. Members shall serve without
compensation.
(a) There shall be established a fund to be known as the program for local art and
community engagement fund ("the PLACE Fund"). The PLACE Fund, in addition to
contributions from private sources, shall receive half-of-one-percent of the public funds allocated
for the construction or renovation of any building or property owned by the Commonwealth, not
to exceed $300,000 per construction or renovation project. This cap shall be adjusted on July 1st
of each year by the growth rate of the inflation index over the preceding 12 months. The
executive office of housing and livable communities shall serve as the PLACE Fund’s treasurer
and custodian.
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the PLACE Commission
shall enter into a contract with the Massachusetts cultural council or another qualified
organization for the administrative operation of the PLACE Commission, which includes serving
as the secretary during PLACE Commission meetings, and perform such other tasks as
determined by the PLACE Commission. The Massachusetts cultural council shall appoint, with
the PLACE Commission’s approval, such additional employees as may be required in the
performance of the PLACE Commission’s duties. All salaries of appointed Massachusetts
cultural council appointed employees shall be drawn from the PLACE Fund. The Commission
may enter into a contract with another qualified organization to manage some or all of
Commission administration only if the Massachusetts Cultural Council fails to adequately
perform its duties under a duly executed contract, ceases to exist, or for just cause. If the
Commission enters into a contract with another qualified organization, the Commission shall
submit, in writing, the reasons for the termination of its contract with the Massachusetts cultural
of 5

council to the chairs of the joint committee on economic development and emerging
technologies and the chairs of the joint committee on tourism, arts and cultural development. A
contract executed pursuant to this section shall address, but shall not be limited to: proposed
rules and guidelines for the fund, providing technical assistance to potential applicants,
reviewing and evaluating applications and providing findings and recommendations to the
Commission as to which grant applications should be approved and awarded and which should
be denied. The Commission shall establish rules relative to the Fund, with the advice of the
committee. Copies of the rules, and any modifications or amendments thereto, shall be delivered
to the clerk of the house of representatives, the clerk of the senate, the chairs of the house and
senate committees on ways and means, the chairs of the joint committee on economic
development and emerging technologies and the chairs of the joint committee on tourism, arts,
and cultural development.
(c) The PLACE Commission, assisted by Massachusetts cultural council and its
designated staff, shall administer the PLACE Fund with the purpose of providing financial
support for the selection, design, creation, acquisition, installation, maintenance, conservation,
and/or promotion of public art in the Commonwealth. Such administration shall include: (i)
establishing and executing processes for the application, approval, acquisition, and installation of
public art projects seeking funds; (ii) working with state agencies to assure compliance with this
section; (iii) working with public and private stakeholders to identify artists, projects, and
installation sites; (iv) ensuring the relevance and acceptance of public art by convening a local
advisory group for each new public art project that includes relevant local site users and
community stakeholders; (v) developing access to and education of public art; and (vi)
cataloguing and maintaining public art.
of 5

(d) In furtherance of the PLACE Commission’s purpose of growing the creative and
general economy throughout Massachusetts, (i) all public art acquired using the PLACE Fund
shall be owned by the Commonwealth; (ii) best efforts shall be exercised to ensure PLACE
Commission projects are distributed across the Commonwealth’s different geographic regions;
and (iii) best efforts shall be exercised by the the PLACE Commission to support artists from
Massachusetts.
(e) Annually, on September 1 of each year, the PLACE Commission shall provide a
report describing the implementation of the PLACE Fund and awarded funds to the secretary of
administration and finance, the house committee on ways and means, the senate committee on
ways and means, the joint committee on tourism, arts and cultural development, the clerk's office
for the house of representatives, and the clerk's office for the senate.
(f) The PLACE Commission shall be established no later than December 1, 2026.
of 5